Hawaii statutes.
§576D-18 Investigators; access to
information. (a) The attorney general shall commission
child support enforcement investigators who shall have all powers and authority
of a police officer or a deputy sheriff to fulfill their official
responsibilities; provided that a person so appointed and commissioned
shall not carry firearms.

(b) The duties of the commissioned
investigators shall be to locate absent parents for the establishment of
paternity, and for obtaining and enforcing orders of support.

(c) The agency and other state agencies administering
a program under Title IV-D shall have access, including automated inquiry
access, to the records of all entities in the State for information on the
employment, compensation, and benefits of any individual member, employee, or
contractor of the entity, to accomplish the purposes of the child support
program. The entities include but are not limited to for-profit, nonprofit,
and labor organizations, and any agency, board, commission, authority, court,
or committee of the State or its political subdivisions, notwithstanding
any provision for confidentiality. Subject to safeguards on privacy and
confidentiality and subject to the nonliability of entities that afford access
under this section, the agency and other state agencies administering a program
under Title IV-D shall also have access to records held by private entities
with respect to individuals who owe or are owed support, or against or with
respect to whom a support obligation is sought consisting of:

(1) The names and addresses of individuals and the
names and addresses of the employers of those individuals as appearing in
customer records of public utilities and cable television companies, pursuant
to an administrative subpoena authorized pursuant to section 576E-2; and

(2) Information, including information on assets and
liabilities, on the individuals held by financial institutions.

(d) Other state and federal agencies
conducting activities under Title IV-D shall have access to any system used by
the State to locate an individual for purposes relating to motor vehicles or
law enforcement.

(e) Notwithstanding section 338-18, the
agency, through the offices of county corporation counsels, county attorneys,
or the attorney general, shall have access, including automated inquiry access,
to the public health statistics records of the department of health and may
make only such use of identifying information in those records as is necessary
for purposes consistent with Title IV-D and applicable state laws. The United
States Secretary of Health and Human Services or the Secretary's agent,
notwithstanding section 338-18, shall also have access, including automated
inquiry access, to the public health statistics records of the department of
health solely for purposes of funding and oversight under Title IV-D. [L 1997,
c 293, pt of §6; am L 1998, c 153, §7; am L 2002, c 84, §5; am L 2004, c 80, §2;
am L 2011, c 79, §6]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next